California, session 20252026, AB1611.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 18031.6 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:18031.6. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exchange of property held for productive use or investment, shall not apply to gain from the exchange of qualified property in this state if the taxpayer owns 50 or more qualified properties at the time the exchange is completed.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Owns” includes direct ownership as a named owner of the property or indirect ownership through any partial or full ownership interest in an entity that owns the property.(2) “Qualified property” means a single-family residential rental real property.(3) “Single-family residential rental real property” means any of the following:(A) Real property improved with one to four dwelling units, including any leasehold exceeding one year’s duration of such.(B) A unit in a residential stock cooperative, condominium, or planned unit development.(C) A mobilehome or manufactured home when offered for sale or sold through a real estate broker pursuant to Section 10131.6 of the Business and Professions Code.(c) (1) This section shall apply to exchanges completed on or after January 1, 2026, for purposes of taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2026.(2) This section shall not apply to an exchange where the property to be disposed of by the taxpayer in the exchange is disposed of by that taxpayer on or before January 1, 2026, or where the property to be received by the taxpayer in the exchange is received by that taxpayer on or before January 1, 2026.SEC. 2. Section 24941.6 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:24941.6. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, Section 1031 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to exchange of property held for productive use or investment, shall not apply to gain from the exchange of qualified property in this state if the taxpayer owns 50 or more qualified properties at the time the exchange is completed.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Owns” includes direct ownership as a named owner of the property or indirect ownership through any partial or full ownership interest in an entity that owns the property.(2) “Qualified property” means a single-family residential rental real property.(3) “Single-family residential rental real property” means any of the following:(A) Real property improved with one to four dwelling units, including any leasehold exceeding one year’s duration of such.(B) A unit in a residential stock cooperative, condominium, or planned unit development.(C) A mobilehome or manufactured home when offered for sale or sold through a real estate broker pursuant to Section 10131.6 of the Business and Professions Code.(c) (1) This section shall apply to exchanges completed on or after January 1, 2026, for purposes of taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2026.(2) This section shall not apply to an exchange where the property to be disposed of by the taxpayer in the exchange is disposed of by that taxpayer on or before January 1, 2026, or where the property to be received by the taxpayer in the exchange is received by that taxpayer on or before January 1, 2026.SEC. 3. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.